Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.340

Manufactured homes, mobile homes, recreational vehicles—Safety rules—Compliance—Penalty.

(1) The director shall adopt specific rules for conversion vending units and medical units. The rules for conversion vending units and medical units shall be established to protect the occupants from fire; to address other life safety issues; and to ensure that the design and construction are capable of supporting any concentrated load of five hundred pounds or more. Also, the director shall adopt specific rules concerning safety standards as necessary to implement subsection (3) of this section by January 1, 2006.

(2) The director of labor and industries shall adopt rules governing safety of body and frame design, and the installation of plumbing, heating, and electrical equipment in mobile homes, commercial coaches, recreational vehicles, and/or park trailers: PROVIDED, That the director shall not prescribe or enforce rules governing the body and frame design of recreational vehicles and park trailers until after the American national standards institute shall have published standards and specifications upon this subject. The rules shall be reasonably consistent with recognized and accepted principles of safety for body and frame design and plumbing, heating, and electrical installations, in order to protect the health and safety of the people of this state from dangers inherent in the use of substandard and unsafe body and frame design, construction, plumbing, heating, electrical, and other equipment and shall correlate with and, so far as practicable, conform to the then current standards and specifications of the American national standards institute standards A119.1 for mobile homes and commercial coaches, A119.2 for recreational vehicles, and A119.5 for park trailers.

(3) Except as provided in RCW 43.22.436, it shall be unlawful for any person to lease, sell or offer for sale, within this state, any mobile homes, commercial coaches, conversion vending units, medical units, recreational vehicles, and/or park trailers manufactured after January 1, 1968, containing plumbing, heating, electrical, or other equipment, and after July 1, 1970, body and frame design or construction, unless such equipment, design, or construction meets the requirements of the rules provided for in this section.

(4) Any person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. Each day upon which a violation occurs shall constitute a separate violation.

[ 2005 c 399 s 2; 2003 c 53 s 228; 2002 c 268 s 6; 1999 c 22 s 2; 1995 c 280 s 2; 1970 ex.s. c 27 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 229 s 1; 1967 c 157 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Purpose—Finding—Effective dates—2002 c 268: See notes following RCW 43.22.434.